Nevada, session 83, SB73.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.558 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.558 1. The county or city clerk shall disclose the
identification number of a registered voter to the public, including,
without limitation:
(a) In response to an inquiry received by the county or city
clerk; or
(b) By inclusion of the identification number of the registered
voter on any list of registered voters made available for public
inspection pursuant to NRS 293.301, 293.440, 293.557, 293C.290
or 293C.542.
2. The county or city clerk shall not disclose:
(a) The social security number or the driver’s license or
identification card number of a registered voter, and such a number
is confidential and is not a public book or record within the meaning
of NRS 239.010.
(b) An electronic mail address provided by a registered voter to
carry out any state or federal law relating to the voting process, and
such an electronic mail address is confidential and is not a public
book or record within the meaning of NRS 239.010. The county or
city clerk may not release a registered voter’s electronic mail
address to a third party and may use such an electronic mail address
only to:
(1) Communicate with the registered voter about the voting
process, including, without limitation, as necessary to carry out the
provisions of chapter 293D of NRS; and
(2) Distribute a sample ballot to the registered voter by
electronic means if the county or city clerk has established a system
for distributing sample ballots by electronic means pursuant to NRS
293.565 or 293C.530 and the registered voter elects to receive a
sample ballot by electronic means.
3. A registered voter may submit a written request to the
county or city clerk to have his or her address and telephone number
withheld from the public. Upon receipt of such a request, the county
or city clerk shall not disclose the address or telephone number of
the registered voter to the public, including, without limitation:
(a) In response to an inquiry received by the county or city
clerk; or
(b) By inclusion on any list of registered voters made available
for public inspection pursuant to NRS 293.301, 293.440, 293.557,
293C.290 or 293C.542.
-
*SB73*

– 3 –
4. [No] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, no
information relating to a registered voter may be withheld from the
public other than:
(a) The address and telephone number of the registered voter if
requested by the registered voter pursuant to this section;
(b) An electronic mail address provided by the registered voter
to carry out any state or federal law relating to the voting process;
(c) The social security number and driver’s license or
identification card number of the registered voter; and
(d) Any other information relating to the registered voter that
any state or federal law declares to be confidential or otherwise
requires to be withheld from the public.
5. The county or city clerk:
(a) Shall allow any person to inspect the signature of a
registered voter at the office of the county or city clerk.
(b) Shall not provide a copy or allow a person to copy the
signature of any registered voter.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB73*